Arkansas, session 2025, HB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Arkansas Children and Teens' Online Privacy Protection Act

4-88-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas
Children and Teens' Online Privacy Protection Act".

4-88-1502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Child" means an individual twelve (12) years of age or
younger;
(2) "Connected device" means a device that is capable of
connecting to the Internet, directly or indirectly, or to another connected
device;
(3)(A) "Disclosure" means making personal information that is
*LJH016*
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
collected from a child or teen by a website, online service, online
application, or mobile application targeted toward children or teens or that
collect with actual knowledge the personal information from a child or teen,
publicly available in an identifiable form to a third party not affiliated
with the operator.
(B) "Disclosure" does not include information provided to a person
other than an operator who provides support for the internal operations of
the website, online service, online application, or mobile application of the
operator, excluding any activity related to individual-specific advertising
to children or teens;
(4) "Internet" means collectively a system of interconnected
computer networks that comprise the interconnected world-wide network of
networks and employ without limitation the Transmission Control
Protocol/Internet Protocol, or any predecessor or successor protocols to such
protocol, or the User Datagram Protocol to communicate information of all
kinds by wire or radio;
(5) "Mobile application" means:
(A) A software program that runs on the operating system
of:
(i) A cellular telephone;
(ii) A tablet computer; or
(iii) A similar portable computing device that
transmits data over a wireless connection; and
(B) Includes without limitation a service or application
offered via a connected device;
(6) "Online application" means an Internet-connected software
program and includes without limitation a service or application offered via
a connected device;
(7) "Online contact information" means an email address or
another substantially similar identifier that permits direct contact with a
person online;
(8)(A)(i) "Operator" means a person who, for commercial
purposes, operates or provides a website on the internet, an online service,
an online application, or a mobile application, and who:
(ii)(a) Collects or maintains, either directly or
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
through a service provider, personal information from or about the users of
that website, service, or application; or
(b) Allows another person to collect personal
information directly from users of that website, service, or application, in
which case, the operator is deemed to have collected the information.

(B) "Operator" does not include:
(i) Any nonprofit entity that would otherwise be
exempt from coverage under section 5 of the Federal Trade Commission Act, 15
U.S.C. § 45 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(ii) An interactive gaming platform that complies with the
requirements of the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. §
6501, as it existed on January 1, 2025, and the rules, guidance, and
exemptions under that act, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(iii) An agency, board, commission, institution, or
other instrumentality of the State of Arkansas or its political subdivisions;
or
(iv) A public educational entity of the State of
Arkansas, including without limitation a school district and an institution
of higher learning;
(9) "Parent" means a natural parent, adoptive parent, legal
guardian, or legal custodian of an individual who is sixteen (16) years of
age or younger;
(10) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other entity;
(11)(A) "Personal information" means individually identifiable
information about an individual collected online, including without
limitation:
(i) A first and last name;
(ii) A home or other physical address including
street name and name of the city or town of residence;
(iii) An e-mail address;
(iv) A telephone number;
(v) A Social Security number;
(vi) Any other identifier that permits the physical
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
or online contacting of a specific individual;
(vii) Geolocation information sufficient to identify
a street name and a city or town;
(viii) Information generated from the measurement or
technological processing of an individual's biological, physical, or
physiological characteristics that is used to identify an individual,
including without limitation:
(a) Fingerprints;
(b) Voice prints;
(c) Iris or retina imagery scans;
(d) Facial templates;
(e) Deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) information;
or
(f) Gait;
(ix) Information linked or reasonably linkable to a
child or teen; or
(x) Information linked or reasonably linkable to a
child or teen, including without limitation any unique identifier, that an
operator collects online from the child or teen and combines with an
identifier described in subdivision this subdivision (11)(A).
(B) "Personal information" does not include an audio file
that contains a child or teen’s voice so long as the operator:
(i) Does not request information via voice that
would otherwise be considered personal information under subdivision (11)(A)
of this section;
(ii) Provides clear notice of its collection and use
of the audio file and its deletion policy in its privacy policy;
(iii) Only uses the voice within the audio file
solely as a replacement for written words, to perform a task, or engage with
a website, online service, online application, or mobile application, such as
to perform a search or fulfill a verbal instruction or request; and
(iv) Only maintains the audio file long enough to
complete the stated purpose and then immediately deletes the audio file and
does not make any other use of the audio file prior to deletion;
(12)(A) "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
to a consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal data
obtained from that consumer's activities over time and across nonaffiliated
websites or online applications to predict such consumer's preferences or
interests.
(B) "Targeted advertising" does not include:
(i) Advertising based on activities within a
controller's own websites or online applications;
(ii) Advertising based on the context of a
consumer's current search query or visit to a website or online application;
(iii) Advertising directed to a consumer in response
to the consumer's request for information or feedback; or
(iv) Processing of personal data that is processed
solely for measuring or reporting advertising performance, reach, or
frequency;
(13) "Teen" means an individual who is:
(A) Thirteen (13) years of age or older; and
(B) Younger than seventeen (17) years of age; and
(14) "Verifiable consent" means any reasonable effort, including
without limitation a request for authorization for future collection, use,
and disclosure described in the notice, to ensure that, in the case of a
child, a parent of the child, or, in the case of a teen, the teen:
(A) Receives specific notice of the personal information
collection, use, and disclosure practices of the operator; and
(B) Before the personal information of the child or teen
is collected, freely and unambiguously authorizes:
(i) The collection, use, and disclosure, as
applicable, of that personal information; and
(ii) Any subsequent use of that personal
information.
4-88-1503. Personal information from and about children and teens —
Online collection and use.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, it
is unlawful for an operator of a website, online service, online application,
or mobile application with actual knowledge that it is collecting personal
information from children or teens:
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
(A) To collect personal information from a child or teen
in a manner that violates subsection (b) of this section;
(B) To collect, use, disclose to third parties, or compile
personal information of a child or teen for purposes of targeted advertising
to children or teens or to allow another person to collect, use, disclose, or
compile this information for targeted advertising to children or teens;
(C) To collect the personal information of a child or teen
except when the collection of the personal information is:
(i) Consistent with the context of a particular
service or the relationship of the child or teen with the operator, including
without limitation collection that is necessary to fulfill a transaction or
provide a product or service requested by the child or teen; or
(ii) Required or specifically authorized by law; or
(D) To retain the personal information of a child or teen
for longer that is reasonably necessary to fulfill a transaction or provide a
service requested by the child or teen except as required for the safety or
integrity of the service or specifically authorized by law.
(2) Neither an operator nor the operator’s agent shall be liable
for a disclosure made in good faith and following reasonable procedures in
responding to a request for disclosure of personal information under
subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section to the parent of a child or to a teen
under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section.
(b) An operator of a website, online service, online application, or
mobile application that has actual knowledge that it is collecting personal
information from children or teens shall:
(1) Provide clear and conspicuous notice of:
(A) What information is collected from children or teens
by the operator;
(B) The purpose for processing personal data;
(C) The operator’s disclosure practices for such information;
(D) The rights and opportunities available to the parent of the child
or teen under subdivisions (b)(3) and (b)(4) of this section;
(E) The categories of personal data that the controller shares with
third parties, if any; and
(F) The categories of third parties, if any, with whom the controller
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
shares personal data;
(2) Obtain verifiable consent for the collection, use, or disclosure
of personal information collected from a child or teen from a:
(A) Parent or legal guardian of a child, except to the
extent the processing is permitted under 15 U.S.C. § 6502 and its
implementing regulations; or
(B) A teen, except when the processing is for:
(i) Providing or maintaining a specific product or
service requested by the teen;
(ii) Conducting the operator's internal business
operations, including without limitation identifying and repairing technical
errors that impair existing or intended functionality;
(iii) Protecting against malicious, fraudulent, or
illegal activity or detecting, responding to, or preventing security
incidents or threats;
(iv) Investigating, establishing, exercising,
preparing for, or defending legal claims;
(v) Complying with federal, state, or local laws,
rules, or regulations;
(vi) Complying with a civil, criminal, or regulatory
inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or a summons by federal, state, local, or
other governmental authorities; or
(vii) Protecting the vital interests of a natural
person;
(3) Provide, upon request of a parent under this subsection (b)
whose child has provided personal information to that operator, upon proper
identification of that parent, to the parent:
(A)(i) A description of the specific categories of personal
information collected from the child by that operator; and
(ii) The purposes for which the operator collects,
uses, discloses, and retains the personal information;
(B) The opportunity to:
(i) Request at any time the deletion of the account
of the child or content or information submitted by the child to a website,
online service, online application, or mobile application and to refuse at
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
any time to permit the operator’s further use or maintenance in retrievable
form, or future online collection, of personal information from that child;
and
(ii) Challenge the accuracy of the personal
information and, if the parent of the child establishes the inaccuracy of the
personal information, to have the inaccurate personal information corrected;
and
(C) A means that is reasonable under the circumstances for
the parent to obtain any personal information collected from that child, if
that information is available to the operator at the time the parent makes
the request;
(4) Provide, upon the request of a teen under subdivision (b)(1)
of this section who has provided personal information to the operator and
upon proper identification of that teen:
(A) A description of the specific categories of personal
information collected from the teen by the operator and the purposes for
which the operator collects, uses, discloses, and retains the personal
information;
(B) The opportunity at any time to delete personal
information collected from the teen or content or information submitted by
the teen to a website, online service, online application, or mobile
application;
(C) The opportunity to challenge the accuracy of the
personal information and, if the teen establishes the inaccuracy of the
personal information, to have the inaccurate personal information corrected;
and
(D) A means that is reasonable under the circumstances for
the teen to obtain any personal information collected from the teen, if the
information is available to the operator at the time the teen makes the
request;
(5) Not require a child to disclose more personal information
than is reasonably necessary to participate as a condition to participate in:
(A) A game;
(B) The offering of a prize; or
(C) Another activity; and
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
(6) Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable security
practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of
personal information of children or teens collected by the operator, and
protect the personal information against unauthorized access.
(c) Verifiable consent under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section is
not required in the case of:
(1) Online contact information collected from a child or teen
that is used only to respond directly on a one-time basis to a specific
request from the child or teen and is not used to recontact the child or teen
or to contact another child or teen and is not maintained in retrievable form
by the operator;
(2) A request for the name or online contact information of a
parent or teen that is used for the sole purpose of obtaining verifiable
consent or providing notice under this section and where such information is
not maintained in retrievable form by the operator if verifiable consent is
not obtained after a reasonable time;
(3) Online contact information collected from a child or teen
that is used only to respond more than once directly to a specific request
from the child or teen and is not used to recontact the child or teen beyond
the scope of that request if, before any additional response after the
initial response to the child or teen, the operator uses reasonable efforts
to provide a parent or teen notice of the online contact information
collected from the child or teen, the purposes for which it is to be used,
and an opportunity for the parent or teen to request that the operator make
no further use of the information and that it not be maintained in
retrievable form; and
(4) The name of the child or teen and online contact
information, to the extent reasonably necessary to protect the safety of a
child or teen participant on the site:
(A) Used only for the purpose of protecting such safety;
(B) Not used to recontact the child or teen or for any
other purpose; and
(C) Not disclosed on the site, if the operator uses
reasonable efforts to provide a parent or teen notice of the name and online
contact information collected from the child or teen, the purposes for which
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
it is to be used, and an opportunity for the parent or teen to request that
the operator make no further use of the information and that it not be
maintained in retrievable form; or
(5) The collection, use, or dissemination of such information by
the operator necessary to:
(A) Protect the security or integrity of its website;
(B) Take precautions against liability;
(C) Respond to judicial process; or
(D) Protect the security or safety of the user on the
service; or
(E) Provide information to law enforcement agencies or for
an investigation on a matter related to public safety.
(d)(1) An operator may terminate service provided to a child whose
parent has refused or a teen who has refused under subdivision (b)(2) of this
section to permit the operator's further use or maintenance in retrievable
form or future online collection of personal information from that child or
teen.
(2) An operator shall not discontinue service provided to a
child or teen on the basis of a request by the parent or the child or by the
teen under subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i) of this section to delete personal
information collected from the child or teen, to the extent that the operator
is capable of providing this service without the personal information.
(3) A request made under subdivisions (b)(3)(B)(i) of this
section to delete personal information of a child or teen shall not be
construed to:
(A) Limit the authority of a law enforcement agency to
obtain any content or information from an operator under a lawfully executed
warrant or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction; and
(B) Require an operator or third party to delete
information that:
(i) Another law requires the operator or third party
to maintain;
(ii) Was submitted to the website, online service,
online application, or mobile application of the operator by any person other
than the user who is attempting to erase or otherwise eliminate the content
03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
or information, including without limitation content or information submitted
by the user that was republished or resubmitted by another person; or
(iii) Prohibit an operator from retaining a record
of the deletion request and the minimum information necessary for the
purposes of ensuring compliance with a request made under subsection (b) of
this section or ensuring that the child or teen's information remains
deleted.
(e) Except as provided under § 4-88-1503 and § 4-88-1505, a violation
of subdivisions (b)(2) and (b)(3) of this section shall be treated as an
unfair or deceptive act or practice prescribed under the Deceptive Trade
Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.

4-88-1504. Enforcement.
In a case in which the Attorney General has reason to believe that an
interest of the residents of the state has been or is threatened or adversely
affected by the engagement of any person in a practice that violates the
provisions of this subchapter, the Attorney General may bring a civil action
on behalf of the residents of the state in a court of competent jurisdiction
to:
(1) Enjoin that practice;
(2) Enforce compliance with the rule;
(3) Obtain damages, restitution, or other compensation on behalf
of residents of the state; or
(4) Obtain such other relief as the court finds appropriate.

4-88-1505. Construction.
This subchapter shall not be construed to require an operator to:
(1) Affirmatively collect any personal information regarding the
age of a child or teen that an operator is not already collecting in the
normal course of business; or
(2) Implement an age-gating or age verification functionality.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act shall be effective on and after July 1, 2026.

03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082
/s/Gramlich


































03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 H1/30/25 H2/10/25 H2/19/25 H2/25/25 H2/26/25 H3/3/25
HB1082

03-03-2025 10:25:05 LJH016